Hawaii, session 2026, HB1608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds and declares that the issuance of special purpose revenue bonds under this Act is in the public interest and for the public health, safety, and general welfare. SECTION 2. Pursuant to part V, chapter 39A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the department of budget and finance, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to issue special purpose revenue bonds in a total amount not to exceed $40,000,000, in one or more series, for the purpose of assisting Fenix Space, Inc., a Delaware corporation, for the planning, design, procurement, and construction of a Fenix launch platform system for operations in the State, and the Fenix Space Hilo flight operations facility, a special purpose facility, a special purpose facility.  The facility shall include offices, a payload integration clean room, and hangar space with special equipment and be located at the Hilo International Airport.  The legislature hereby finds and determines that the planning, design, and construction of the Fenix launch platform system and Fenix Space Hilo flight operations facility constitute a project as defined in part V, chapter 39A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and the financing thereof is assistance to an industrial enterprise. SECTION 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of Act 182, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, as amended by Act 262, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, the legislature authorizes the issuance of special purpose revenue bonds to assist Fenix Space, Inc. in building facilities pursuant to part V, chapter 39A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, relating to the power to issue special purpose revenue bonds to assist industrial enterprises that requires the allocation of the annual state ceiling under section 39B-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the period July 1, 2026, through December 31, 2028. SECTION 4. The special purpose revenue bonds and the refunding special purpose revenue bonds issued under this Act shall be issued pursuant to part V, chapter 39A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, relating to the power to issue special purpose revenue bonds to assist industrial enterprises. SECTION 5. The department of budget and finance is authorized, from time to time, including times subsequent to June 30, 2031, to issue special purpose revenue bonds in whatever principal amounts the department shall determine to be necessary to refund the special purpose revenue bonds authorized in section 2 and to refund special purpose revenue bonds authorized in this section, regardless of whether the outstanding special purpose revenue bonds or refunding special purpose revenue bonds have matured or are the subject of redemption or whether the refunding special purpose revenue bonds shall be bonds for the multi-project programs described in section 2.  In making this determination, the department shall comply with federal law relating to the exemption from federal income taxation of the interest on bonds of the nature authorized by this section. SECTION 6. The authorization to issue special purpose revenue bonds under this Act shall lapse on June 30, 2031. SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________